California, session 20252026, AB1055.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66315 of the Government Code is amended to read:66315. Section 66314 establishes the maximum standards that a local agency shall use to evaluate a proposed accessory dwelling unit on a lot that includes a proposed or existing single-family dwelling. No additional standards, other than those provided in Section 66314, shall be used or imposed, including an owner-occupant requirement, except that a local agency may require either any of the following:(a) That the property may be used for rentals of terms 30 days or longer.(b)Proof of residential occupancy for any streamlining of accessory dwelling units or junior accessory dwelling units.(b) (1) The property owner to certify that the accessory dwelling unit will be occupied as a residential dwelling unit for at least six months out of each calendar year.(2) The certification shall not be made under penalty of perjury.(c) The local agency may annually recertify for the first 10 years, through self-certification of the owner of the accessory dwelling unit, that the accessory dwelling unit is occupied as a residential dwelling unit for at least six months out of each calendar year.(d) (1) In enforcing subdivision (c), a local agency shall include at least two notices to the owner of the accessory dwelling unit.(2) In enforcing subdivision (c), a local agency shall not do either of the following:(A) Require the owner of an accessory dwelling unit to tear down their accessory dwelling unit for not being used as a residential dwelling unit for at least six months out of each calendar year.(B) (i) Charge more than a reasonable fine for failure to comply with subdivision (c).(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, a reasonable fine is a fine as described in subdivision (c) of Section 25132.